Hawaii statutes.
[BICYCLES
AND MOPEDS]

Cross References

Use of highway fund
for bikeways, see §264-18.

§249-14 Bicycle fee. [Section
effective January 1, 2017. For section effective until December 31, 2016, see
main volume.] (a) Bicycles having two tandem wheels that are twenty
inches or more in diameter are required to be registered and shall be subject
to a permanent registration fee of $15, to be paid by the owners thereof to the
director of finance.

(b) An owner of a bicycle having two tandem
wheels that are less than twenty inches in diameter is not required to register
such bicycle, but may do so to facilitate the return of recovered stolen
bicycles by payment of the registration fee. The fee collected shall not be
refunded or prorated. Upon receipt of the fee, the director of finance shall
number and register each bicycle for which the fee is paid, in the owner's name
and furnish the owner with a metallic tag or decal for each bicycle which shall
be attached to the bicycle or moped. On bicycles the decal shall be affixed to
the upright post attached to the sprocket facing in the forward direction. Upon
initial registration by an owner or transferee, the director of finance shall
require proof of ownership and require the owner to furnish verification of the
serial number and description contained in the proof of ownership and
application for registration. The metallic tags or decals shall be in a form
as the director of finance shall from time to time prescribe. It shall be the
duty of the director of finance of each county to purchase a sufficient number
of these tags or decals.

(c) All fees collected under this section
shall be deposited into the bikeway fund and shall be expended in the county in
which the fees are collected as provided in section 249-17.5.

§249-14 Bicycle and moped fee. (a)
Bicycles having two tandem wheels that are twenty inches or more in diameter
and all mopeds are required to be registered and shall be subject to a
permanent registration fee of $15, to be paid by the owners thereof to the
director of finance.

(b) An owner of a bicycle having two tandem
wheels that are less than twenty inches in diameter is not required to register
such bicycle, but may do so to facilitate the return of recovered stolen
bicycles by payment of the registration fee. The fee collected shall not be
refunded or prorated. Upon receipt of the fee, the director of finance shall
number and register each bicycle and moped for which the fee is paid, in the
owner's name and furnish the owner with a metallic tag or decal for each
bicycle or moped which shall be attached to the bicycle or moped. On bicycles
the decal shall be affixed to the upright post attached to the sprocket facing
in the forward direction. On mopeds the decal shall be affixed to the lower
portion of the rear fender facing rearward. Upon initial registration by an
owner or transferee, the director of finance shall require proof of ownership
and require the owner to furnish verification of the serial number and
description contained in the proof of ownership and application for
registration. The metallic tags or decals shall be in a form as the director
of finance shall from time to time prescribe. It shall be the duty of the
director of finance of each county to purchase a sufficient number of these
tags or decals.

(c) All fees collected under this section
shall be deposited into the bikeway fund and shall be expended in the county in
which the fees are collected as provided in section 249-17.5. [L 1903, c 54, pt
of §1; am L 1905, c 101, pt of §1; am L 1923, c 120, pt of §1; RL 1925, pt of
§1308; RL 1935, pt of §2151; RL 1945, pt of §5702; RL 1955, §130-12; am L 1963,
c 79, §1; HRS §249-14; am L 1972, c 25, §2 and c 116, §2; am L 1974, c 105, §3;
am L 1975, c 187, §2; am L 1978, c 175, §2; am L 1988, c 264, §1; am L 1998, c
188, §2; am L 2016, c 200, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next